Arkansas, session 2025, HB1647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-11-128(b)(1), concerning definitions
pertaining to the Arkansas Public School Computer Network, is amended to read
as follows:
(1) Periodically conducting a thorough security review and
security risk assessment for all information, including without limitation
personally identifiable employee and student information, that originates in
the school districts and terminates on the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology and Arkansas Public School Computer Network
servers;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-21-112(h), concerning the Division of
Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, is amended to read as
follows:
(h) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
*LGL092*
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
coordinate and share certain administrative, custodial, legal, internal
finance, and other necessary personnel and responsibilities to effectuate the
daily operations of the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation and the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-47-502(b)(3), concerning distance
learning grants of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) The distance learning technical protocol or protocols shall
be in alignment with technical standards set by the Director of the Division
of Information Systems Office of State Technology.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-60-1302(b)(4), concerning entities the
Division of Higher Education shall work with to collect and compile
information, is amended to read as follows:
(4) The Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology; and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-9-124(b), concerning the voter
registration signature imaging system, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
shall cooperate with and assist the Secretary of State in determining the
computer equipment and software needed in the office of the Secretary of
State for the voter registration signature imaging system.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 10-3-1704(c), concerning the duties of the
Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information
Technology shall exercise appropriate legislative oversight of the operations
of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 10-3-1705 is amended to read as follows:
10-3-1705. Duties of joint standing committee.
Bills pertaining to the Division of Information Systems Office of State
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Technology, advanced communications and information technology, telemedicine,
distance learning, or public information access shall be referred to the
Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or the
Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, as
appropriate.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 10-3-1707(c), concerning interim committee
meetings, is amended to read as follows:
(c) All other appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited
to, the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology, the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission, and public colleges and
universities in the State of Arkansas, shall be available to assist the Joint
Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology on advanced
communications and information technology matters as may be requested by the
Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 10-4-424(c), concerning the audit of
information systems operations, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology,
its successor agency, or other entities of the state or political
subdivisions of the state that provide internet, network, or other computer
services or information to an entity of the state or a political subdivision
of the state shall provide access to all data, support, or other necessary
information services to Arkansas Legislative Audit in connection with their
functions at no cost to Arkansas Legislative Audit.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 12-1-104(a)(2), concerning the bail
reporting system of the Arkansas Crime Information Center, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) To facilitate the administration of the portal required under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the Arkansas Crime Information Center may
seek the assistance of the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology or enter into a contract for technical database and data
processing services.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 12-75-111(d)(4), concerning the powers and
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
duties of the Division of Emergency Management, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) The Division of Emergency Management may request the
assistance of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
in reviewing technology-related emergency operation plans.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 12-75-132(b)(18), concerning the
representatives of the Arkansas Homeland Security Advisory Group, is amended
to read as follows:
(18) Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 15-21-502(10), concerning definitions
pertaining to the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board, is amended
to read as follows:
(10) “State Chief Technology Officer” means the Director of the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology;

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 15-55-213 is amended to read as follows:
15-55-213. Access to information.
The Office of the State Geologist and the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology shall grant access to and provide
information determined by the Commissioner of State Lands to be necessary to
successfully accomplish the Commissioner of State Lands' mission.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 16-93-214(b)(3), concerning the mobile
application concerning inmates and parolees, the Safe Arkansas App, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) To facilitate the administration of the mobile application
required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the board may seek the
assistance of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services or enter into a
contract for technical database and data processing services.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 19-4-522(c)(1), concerning the maintenance
and general operation of the financial management system, is amended to read
as follows:
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(1) In the event the amount of any of the budget classifications
of maintenance and general operation in an agency's appropriation act are
found by the administrative head of the agency to be inadequate, then the
agency head may request, upon forms provided for such purpose by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, a modification of the amounts of the budget
classification. In that event, he or she shall set out on the forms the
particular classifications for which he or she is requesting an increase or
decrease, the amounts thereof, and his or her reasons therefor. In no event
shall the total amount of the budget exceed either the amount of the
appropriation or the amount of the funds available, nor shall any transfer be
made from the capital outlay or data processing subclassification unless
specific authority for such transfers is provided by law, except for
transfers from capital outlay to data processing when determined by the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology that data
processing services for a state agency can be performed on a more cost-
efficient basis by the division office than through the purchase of data
processing equipment by that state agency;

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1055 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-1055. Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
Revolving Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
Revolving Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of nonrevenue receipts derived from
services provided to various agencies of the federal, state, city, and county
governments, and any other moneys which may be provided by law.
(2) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
as set out in the Arkansas Information Systems Act of 1997, § 25-4-101 et
seq.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1056(b)(1), concerning the
Information Technology Reserve Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Information Technology Reserve Fund shall consist of those
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
funds transferred from the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology Revolving Fund in an amount up to the authorized reserve for
equipment acquisition as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
within thirty (30) days following the closing of each fiscal year, any loans
which may be received from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund, and any other
moneys which may be provided by law.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1004(e)(2), concerning restrictions
on professional and consultant services contracts, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) However, the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology may employ persons over whom they exercise day-to-day managerial
control for those services under § 25-4-112 for which professional services
contracts may be used.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 20-8-404 is amended to read as follows:
20-8-404. Rules.
The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology,
Department of Finance and Administration, Department of Health, Department of
Human Services, State Insurance Department, and all other appropriate
departments, agencies, subcontractors, and officers shall promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 21-2-805(a)(1)(C), concerning the members
of the Arkansas Cyber Response Board, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The Director of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology or his or her designee;

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 23-17-409(b)(4), concerning the
authorization of competing local exchange carriers under the
Telecommunications Regulatory Reform Act of 2013, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) A government entity may purchase voice, data, broadband,
video, or wireless telecommunications services, directly or indirectly, from
a private provider through a contract administered and services managed by
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology under the
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Arkansas Information Systems Act of 1997, § 25-4-101 et seq.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 25-1-203(b)(2), concerning the
distribution of certain publications on state agency websites, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) The Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology shall assist those state agencies requesting assistance in placing
publications on the state agency's website.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 25-4-102 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-102. Legislative findings and declaration of intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds and declares information and
information resources to be strategic assets of the State of Arkansas and
that procedures must be established to ensure that:
(1) Information resources are used in an efficient manner;
(2) Resources of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology are used unless an exception is authorized;
(3) Information is administered and shared, consistent with
requirements for security, privacy, and confidentiality;
(4) Information technology acquisitions meet state needs and are
consistent with coordinated efforts to maximize standardization and cost
effectiveness;
(5) State officials have timely access to information in useful
forms; and
(6) The division office complies with applicable state and
federal statutory and regulatory provisions.
(b) The General Assembly further declares its intent to create a state
agency division office to:
(1) Provide design and management services for the state's core
information technology infrastructures;
(2) Provide information technology services;
(3) Implement appropriate technologies to exchange and share
information; and
(4) Develop technical standards and specifications and provide
technical leadership and guidance to support the state's enterprise
architecture.
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(c) It is also the intent of the General Assembly that the division
office achieve certain objectives that will better support information
technology utilization by other state agencies. These objectives are to:
(1) Implement increased capabilities for communication and
exchange of information; and
(2) Develop and publish mechanisms for more timely acquisition
of information technology.
(d)(1) The General Assembly further finds and determines that:
(A) Information technology services are readily available
in the private sector;
(B) The public interest would be well served by
competition for the provision of such services to the state;
(C) Public-private partnerships or joint ventures for the
provision of such services may be appropriate in certain instances; and
(D) Emphasis will be given to encouraging and enabling
competition among: suppliers of such services whenever possible in the
administration of this chapter.
(i) Suppliers of such services whenever possible in
the administration of this chapter; and
(ii) Women-owned and minority-owned suppliers of such
services whenever possible in the administration of this chapter.
(2) The division office shall consider in the development of the
division office plan and the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology shall emphasize in its recommendations and policies
the availability in the private sector of information technology resources
upon a competitive bid basis with a view to assuring the state of the highest
reasonable quality of resources at the lowest reasonable cost.
(e)(1) In exercising its authority under § 25-4-105, the division
office shall competitively procure information technology except as provided
in this subsection.
(2) The division office is not authorized by § 25-4-105 to
provide information technology services, including telecommunications and
broadband services, to the general public, other than nongovernmental first
responder entities, in competition with private sector telecommunications and
cable communications providers.
(3) Customers of the division office are not authorized to use
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
information technology facilities and services provided by the division
office to provide telecommunications and broadband services to the general
public in competition with private sector telecommunications and cable
communications providers.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 25-4-103(15), concerning definitions
pertaining to the Division of Information Systems, is amended to read as
follows:
(15) “State Chief Technology Officer” means the Director of the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology;

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 25-4-104 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-104. Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology.
(a) There is established within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology.
(b)(1) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
shall be headed by a director to be appointed by the Governor, subject to
confirmation by the Senate in the manner provided by law, and shall serve at
the pleasure of the Governor.
(2) The director shall be a person who, by education and
training, has technical knowledge and management experience in information
technology-related equipment, systems, and services.
(3) The director shall qualify by filing the oath of office
required in the Arkansas Constitution with the Secretary of State.
(c) The director, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services, may establish divisions and the
organizational structure deemed necessary and appropriate for the efficient
performance of the duties imposed under the provisions of this chapter,
provided the organizational structure of the division office shall conform to
the positions authorized and limitations provided therefor in the biennial
appropriation of the division office.
(d) The director, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services, shall appoint the deputy and division
office directors and the professional, technical, and clerical assistants and
employees as necessary to perform the duties imposed by this chapter. All
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
employees of the division office shall be employed by the department and
serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services.
(e) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services any matters relating to abuses of this
chapter.
(f) The director shall recommend statutory changes to the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 25-4-105 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-105. Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology —
General powers and duties.
(a)(1) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
shall be vested with all the powers and duties necessary to administer the
division Office of State Technology and to enable it to carry out fully and
effectively the rules and laws relating to the division Office of State
Technology.
(2) The division's Office of State Technology's powers and
duties relate to information technology and include without limitation:
(A) Conceptualizing, designing, developing, building, and
maintaining common information technology infrastructure elements used by
state agencies and governmental entities;
(B) Providing information technology services to state
agencies, other governmental entities, nongovernmental first responder
entities, and other quasi-governmental entities;
(C) Entering into contracts with state agencies, other
governmental entities, and nongovernmental first responder entities for the
purpose of providing information technology services;
(D)(i) Establishing fair and reasonable schedules of rates
or fees to be paid by customers that are provided service to enable the
division Office of State Technology to recover all allowable costs of
providing the services as provided in this chapter.
(ii) The same rate or fee structure will apply to all
customers receiving services;
(E)(i) Establishing estimated billing rates to be
developed for a period to coincide with the budgeting process.
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(ii) The division Office of State Technology shall
have the authority to adjust billing as necessary to effect compliance with
applicable state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions.
(iii) Billing adjustments shall be subject to the
approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and review by the
Legislative Council;
(F) Acquiring information technology on behalf of state
agencies, the cost of which shall be recovered through customer billings or
through direct funding;
(G) Promulgating rules that are necessary for efficient
administration and enforcement of the powers, functions, and duties of the
division Office of State Technology as provided in this chapter;
(H) Developing a division plan for the Office of State
Technology to support the goals and objectives set forth for it in the state
information technology plans and strategies;
(I) Implementing systems to ensure the security of state
data and state data processing assets, to provide for disaster recovery and
continuity of operations to the state agencies served, and to recover its
costs from the customers benefited;
(J) Performing any additional powers, functions, and
duties that are necessary and appropriate for the proper administration of
the provisions of this chapter;
(K) Providing a State Cyber Security Office to monitor
information resource security issues, coordinating all security measures that
could be used to protect resources by more than one (1) governmental entity,
and acting as an information technology resource to other state agencies;
(L) Assisting in the development of an information
technology security policy for state agencies;
(M) Developing the information technology security policy
for state agencies;
(N) Advising agencies in acquiring information technology
service;
(O) Developing the information technology policies,
standards, and specifications for state agencies and ensuring agencies'
compliance with those policies, procedures, and standards;
(P) Participating in the development of information
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
technology state contracts, including without limitation the identification
of requirements, contract negotiation, and vendor evaluation;
(Q) With respect to their technology functions and
applications, all state departments, boards, commissions, and public
institutions of higher education, consulting and cooperating with the
division Office of State Technology in the formation and implementation of
security policies for the state core information technology infrastructure;
(R) Developing a state information technology plan that
shall establish a state-level mission, goals, and objectives for the use of
information technology;
(S) Identifying and establishing information technology
solutions that can support more than one (1) agency in providing governmental
services;
(T) Advising agencies regarding information technology
contracts and agreements;
(U) Developing policies to promote and facilitate
electronic access to government information and interoperability of
information systems; and
(V) Reviewing and approving agencies' information
technology plans and requests.
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to deprive, transfer, limit,
or in any way alter or change any of the powers vested in the board of
trustees of any institution of higher education under existing constitutional
and statutory provisions.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 25-4-106 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-106. Reporting requirements.
(a)(1) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced
Communications and Information Technology regarding the status of the
Division of Information Systems' Office of State Technology's information
technology responsibilities in state government.
(2) The director may report any factors that are outside the
scope of the division office but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the
division's office's responsibilities.
(b)(1) By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
year, the director shall compile and submit a report to the:
(A) Legislative Council, if submitted between regular
sessions of the General Assembly;
(B) Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session
of the General Assembly; and
(C) Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology.
(2) The report shall:
(A) Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and
commissions for advice regarding information technology planning,
implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products,
services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology
plans; and
(B) Provide a full report of all corresponding
recommendations made by the division office to the requesting state agencies,
boards, and commissions.
(3) The report shall include:
(A) The name of the state agency, board, or commission
requesting the advice;
(B) The name and scope of the project for which advice is
being sought;
(C) The type of advice sought, for example, technical,
product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation,
integration, or upgrades;
(D) A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided
by the division office;
(E) How the recommendation fits into the information
technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;
(F) How the recommendation fits into the state's
information technology plan and state enterprise architecture; and
(G) Other information as may be useful for policy making
decisions by the Legislative Council or the Joint Committee on Advanced
Communications and Information Technology.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 25-4-108(a), concerning the working groups
of the Division of Information Systems, is amended to read as follows:
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(a) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology may appoint working groups as necessary for specific
purposes related to information technology coordination.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 25-4-109 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-109. Information technology centers.
(a) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology is
authorized to establish, maintain, and operate information technology centers
and, in connection therewith, to rent, purchase, install, operate, and
maintain information technology for state agencies as authorized in this
chapter.
(b) The division office is authorized to enter into contracts or
agreements with state agencies for the purpose of providing information
technology.
(c) State agencies are authorized to enter into any contracts with the
division office or its successor that may be necessary or desirable to
effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter or for maximum
utilization of facilities and services that are the subject of this chapter.
(d) Agencies shall use the core information technology infrastructure.
(e) The division office is authorized to enter into agreements and
contracts with public utilities for telecommunications service.
(f) The information technology centers operated by the division office
shall be made available to all state agencies that fall within economical and
feasible boundaries.
(g) Agencies shall use project management for designated activities
defined as a project.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 25-4-110 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-110. Information technology — Planning.
(a) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
shall submit status reports annually or when requested to the Joint Committee
on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.
(b)(1) Each state agency shall develop a biennial information
technology plan that establishes state agency goals, objectives, and policies
regarding the development and use of information technology.
(2)(A) Each state agency shall specifically include a policy
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
regarding the use of the internet.
(B) A statement of the agency's policy regarding the use
of the internet shall include:
(i) The penalties for violations of the agency's
internet policy;
(ii) The number of employees and computers that have
access to the internet and the percentage of those employees and computers to
the total number of employees and computers;
(iii) The needs of the agency and how those needs
relate to the use of the internet; and
(iv) The responsibilities of the agency's employees
as those responsibilities relate to the efficient and responsible use of the
internet.
(3) Plans may be updated by agencies in a timely manner to
remain current and must accommodate changes in the evolving state information
technology plan and standards.
(c) The division office shall distribute criteria, elements, form, and
format for agency plans. Plans may include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives
for information technology;
(2) Goals and objectives for achieving electronic access to
agency records, information, and services;
(3) Consideration of a variety of information technologies,
including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard business
hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;
(4) Compliance with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §
25-19-101 et seq.;
(5) An explanation of how the state agency's mission, goals, and
objectives for information technology support and conform to the state
information technology plan developed by the division office;
(6) An implementation strategy to include:
(A) Annual implementation objectives of the plan;
(B) Methods to educate both state employees and the public
in the effective use of access technologies; and
(C) Agency activities to increase electronic access to
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
public records and information to be implemented within available resources
and existing state agency planning processes;
(7) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of
the plan;
(8) Estimated schedules and funding required to implement
identified projects;
(9) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(10) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the
agency information technology plan;
(11) A discussion of progress toward electronic access to public
information and enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining
information and services from state agencies; and
(12) An inventory of state agency information technology.
(d)(1) Plans developed or updated shall be submitted to the division
office.
(2) The division office may reject, require modification to, or
approve plans as deemed appropriate.
(3) Plans shall be modified by the state agency as necessary.
(e)(1) Plans developed or updated by public instrumentalities shall be
submitted for review to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology.
(2) The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology may seek the assistance of the division office in
conducting this review.
(3) Plans shall be modified by the public instrumentality as
necessary.

SECTION 32. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 25-4-111(b),
concerning information technology prerequisites for state agencies, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) If an agency desires to acquire information technology not part of
an information technology plan approved under § 25-4-110, the requesting
agency shall submit a waiver request to the Director of the Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology that includes:

03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 25-4-111(c)(4)(C), concerning information
technology prerequisites for state agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(C) Notify the agency of the availability of Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology facilities to provide the
requested information technology; or

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 25-4-112(b), concerning applications of
information technology to educational institutions, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) A state-supported institution of higher education, a post-
secondary vocational-technical school, an area vocational school, or a public
school district may request technical assistance regarding information
technology from the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology.
(2)(A) Assistance shall be provided by the division office free
of charge within a reasonable period.
(B) However, the requesting institution shall reimburse
the division office for any actual expenses incurred while providing
requested technical assistance.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 25-4-114(b), concerning contracts and
agreements for information technology, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A state agency shall submit to the Director of the Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology for review and approval a
request for the state agency to enter into a technology contract or agreement
that is not in compliance with the state enterprise architecture.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 25-4-115 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-115. Professional services contracts between division office and
outside vendors.
(a)(1) In the event that, due to unforeseen circumstances, the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology cannot provide
sufficient information technology support to state agencies, the Director of
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology is authorized
to enter into professional services contracts for the necessary information
technology support.
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(2) The division office may also consolidate information
technology needs to satisfy state agency requests.
(b)(1) The division office may utilize moneys appropriated for
maintenance, operation, and payment of regular salaries of the division
office for the purchase of professional services upon approval by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.
(2)(A) Provided, however, that before approving the use of
moneys appropriated for payment of regular salaries of the division office
for obtaining professional services, the secretary shall determine that
resignations, vacancies in positions, or the inability to employ persons with
technical skills to provide the professional services has necessitated that
action.
(B) In addition, the secretary shall obtain the approval
of the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee if the General
Assembly is in session, before approving any transfer of regular salary
appropriations to the maintenance and operation appropriation of a state
agency to be used for payment of professional services.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 25-4-116(a), concerning payment for
information technology, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Before a state agency may enter into an agreement with the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology for purchase of
information technology, the agency shall certify that adequate appropriations
and funds are available for purchasing information technology from the
division office.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 25-4-116(b)(3), concerning payment for
information technology, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The transfers authorized in this chapter shall be made from
time to time within the amounts authorized in the procedures set forth in
this chapter, upon payment for information technology purchased from the
division office.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 25-4-117 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-117. Delinquent accounts.
(a) For accounts that are thirty (30) days overdue and have no charges
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
contested by the user, the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology may request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer all
or part of the overdue amount from the user's account to the division's
office's revolving account. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
transfer the amount within ten (10) working days.
(b) For accounts that are sixty (60) days overdue and have charges
being contested by the user, the division office may request the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State to transfer all or part of the overdue amount from the
user's account to the division's office's revolving account. If the
resolution of contested charges favors the user, the user may request the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer all or part of the overdue
amount from the division's office's revolving account to the user's account.
(c) The division office is authorized to discontinue information
technology service to users who do not make a timely remittance of payment
for services rendered and is specifically prohibited from providing services
to state agencies lacking funds or sufficient appropriations to pay for the
services.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 25-4-119 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-119. Budget procedures.
(a)(1) Prior to the commencement of budget hearings conducted by the
Legislative Council, the Director of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology shall prepare an operating budget indicating the
amount of money that will be required to operate the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology each year of the succeeding biennium.
(2) The director shall also provide cost information to users of
information technology centers, and those who require new or expanded
information technology shall be provided cost estimates for inclusion in
their budget requests.
(b)(1) When the General Assembly has completed the appropriation
process, the director shall oversee budgetary planning for the division
office for each fiscal year of the biennium.
(2) The proposed annual operating budget shall be submitted to
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services for his
or her approval prior to the beginning of each fiscal year.
(3)(A) During the course of the biennium, the director shall
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
make certain that the expenditures of the division office do not exceed the
income to be received by the division office for the current fiscal year.
(B) Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State upon the written application of the division office and
review by the Legislative Council, in order to effect compliance with state
and federal statutory and regulatory provisions:
(i) The director shall adjust rates for services or
issue billing adjustments as necessary; or
(ii) Funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be
provided to the division office.
(4)(A) If rates charged to a customer are increased to ensure
compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions under
subdivision (b)(3) of this section, then the director shall promptly notify
the Governor, the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information
Technology, and all state agencies and other customers before any changes
shall be effected.
(B) Rates shall be reviewed by the division office on no
less than an annual basis in order to ensure compliance with state and
federal statutory and regulatory provisions.
(c) The quarterly allotment procedures applicable to state agencies,
as defined by the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101
et seq., shall be applicable to all appropriations funded directly through
general revenue.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 25-4-120(c), concerning revisions to the
budget, purchasing, and personnel process related to information technology,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
shall make recommendations regarding revisions to the state budget,
purchasing, and personnel process related to information technology to the
Legislative Council by March 1 of each even-numbered year.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 25-4-121 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-121. Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created and established on the books of the Treasurer of
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
State, the Auditor of State, and the Department of Finance and Administration
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology Revolving
Fund.
(b) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
Revolving Fund shall consist of nonrevenue receipts derived from services
provided to various agencies of the federal, state, city, and county
governments, and any other moneys which may be provided by law for credit to
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology Revolving
Fund.
(c) All revenues received by the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology for providing information technology services
shall be deposited into the State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts, there to
be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the division
office.
(d) All revenues received from agencies or other governmental entities
for information technology services provided by contracts between the
division office and outside vendors may be deposited into the State Treasury
as refund to expenditures.
(e) Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State upon written application of the division office and review by the
Legislative Council, the Director of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology shall have the authority to transfer funds between
the Information Technology Reserve Fund established by §§ 19-5-1056 and 25-4-
123 and the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
Revolving Fund established under this section for cash management purposes.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 25-4-122 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-122. Reserve for equipment acquisition — Loans.
(a)(1) The Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
is authorized to accumulate a reserve for equipment acquisition in an amount
not to exceed the division's office's depreciation expense per fiscal year.
(2)(A) In addition, the division office is authorized to obtain
from the State Board of Finance loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund to supplement the reserve if the reserve is insufficient to handle the
total cost of required equipment acquisitions.
(B) These loans and the reserve for equipment acquisition
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
shall be used exclusively for major equipment acquisitions or improvements of
information technology required in order to fulfill the requirements for one
(1) or more user agencies.
(C) The loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to
the Information Technology Reserve Fund shall be repaid within five (5) years
from revenues derived from charges to users, and the annual loan repayment
amount shall be computed as a part of the total yearly expenses of the
division office and shall be charged proportionately to users.
(b)(1)(A) However, before the board approves any requests for loans by
the division office authorized in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
requests shall be submitted to the Governor for his or her approval after the
Governor has first obtained the advice of the Legislative Council in regard
thereto.
(B) After having obtained advice, the Governor may in
writing approve or reject the request.
(C) However, if the Legislative Council fails to give its
written advice or opinion to the Governor within thirty (30) days after
receiving notice of the request for loans, the Governor may proceed to act on
the matter without the advice of the Legislative Council.
(2) The board shall make no loans if the approval of the
Governor has not been obtained therefor.
(3) After obtaining the Governor's approval in writing, the
board shall also review and may approve the loans and establish terms of
repayment and a rate of interest to be paid by the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology Revolving Fund to the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund. The rate shall be approximately equivalent to the rate of
interest the board is receiving on other investments at the time of approving
the loan request.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 25-4-123(b), concerning the Information
Technology Reserve Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Information Technology Reserve Fund shall consist of those
funds transferred from the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology Revolving Fund in an amount up to the authorized reserve for
equipment acquisition as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
within thirty (30) days following the closing of each fiscal year, any loans
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
which may be received from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund, and any other
moneys which may be provided by law, there to be used exclusively for major
equipment acquisitions or improvements as set out in § 25-4-122.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 25-4-124 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-124. Yearly computation of expenses — Disposition of surplus
funds.
(a) Within sixty (60) days following the final closing entries for the
consolidated annual financial report for each fiscal year, the Director of
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology shall obtain
from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the written approval of a plan
that shall include a proposed methodology to make all appropriate adjustments
to effect compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory
provisions for the fiscal year.
(b)(1) If the plan under subsection (a) of this section requires
appropriate credits or debits to customer accounts to effect compliance with
state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions, the Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology shall make any adjustments
within sixty (60) days after approval of the plan.
(2) In the event that a customer no longer uses the services of
the division office, a fund transfer in the amount of that customer's credits
under the plan described in subsection (a) of this section shall be made from
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology Revolving Fund
to the customer's treasury fund, upon certification of the amount by the
director to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Treasurer of State.
In the event the customer does not have a treasury fund, a warrant shall be
issued by the division office in payment of the customer's credit.
(c) In the event that the customer has an unpaid account balance due
the division office, the customer's credit shall be withheld until the
account balance is satisfied.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 25-4-126(a), concerning the Chief Data
Officer of the Division of Information Systems, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology shall select an individual to serve as the Chief Data
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Officer of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology and
the Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology.
(2) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology and the Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology shall not be the same person.

SECTION 47. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 25-4-126(b),
concerning the Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology shall:

SECTION 48. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 25-4-126(c),
concerning the Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology shall:

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 25-4-127(b)(4) and (5), concerning the
members of the Data and Transparency Panel, are amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology.
(B) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology shall be the Chair of the Data and
Transparency Panel.
(C) The members of the panel shall select a vice chair
annually;
(5) The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology; and

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 25-4-127(c)(4), concerning the duties of
the Data and Transparency Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Evaluate and identify data that may be provided to the
public in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology;
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 25-4-127(c)(8)(B), concerning the duties
of the Data and Transparency Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(B) In implementation of the shared services data hub
under subdivision (c)(8)(A) of this section, the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology shall:
(i)(a) Establish and maintain a program to collect,
analyze, and exchange government information in carrying out the powers and
duties of the executive state agency sharing the data.
(b) In carrying out the program under
subdivision (c)(8)(B)(i)(a) of this section, the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology may obtain government information from
each executive state agency;
(ii) Establish and maintain a program to make
government information available to executive state agencies, political
subdivisions, educational institutions, researchers, nongovernmental
organizations, and the general public, subject to the following:
(a)(1) A program established and maintained
under this section shall include a policy governing access to government
information held by the Division of Information Systems Office of State
Technology under this chapter.
(2) Government information may be made
available only if doing so does not violate state or federal confidentiality
and disclosure laws;
(b)(1) The Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology is considered to be an agent of the executive
state agency sharing government information and is an authorized receiver of
government information under the statutory or administrative law that governs
the government information unless:
(A) The Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology or executive state agencies are
specifically excluded as an authorized receiver; or
(B) An authorized receiver of
government information is specifically enumerated under the statutory or
administrative law governing the government information without stated
exceptions or qualifications.
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
(2) Interagency data sharing under this
section does not constitute a disclosure or release under any statutory or
administrative law that governs the government information;
(c)(1) A program established and maintained
under this section shall prescribe a form to be used to memorialize the
sharing of data under this section.
(2) The form required under subdivision
(c)(8)(B)(ii)(c)(1) of this section shall be signed by the administrative
head of the executive state agency so long as the form does not require the
sharing of state agency information that would be in contradiction of
existing state or federal law; and
(d)(1) A data sharing form completed and
signed under subdivision (c)(8)(B)(ii)(c)(1) of this section constitutes the
agreement required by any statutory or administrative law that governs the
data.
(2) Additional documentation is not
required to share data under this section;
(iii) Establish privacy and quality policy for
government information that complies with all applicable Arkansas and federal
laws, rules, and policies;
(iv) According to standards developed by the state
security office, establish and maintain a program to ensure the security of
government information under this section; and
(v) Establish a public portal that will provide
Arkansans with easy access to data.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 25-4-128(a), concerning the records of the
Data and Transparency Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(a) All records, reports, and other information obtained by the Data
and Transparency Panel shall be confidential unless approved for publication
in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the
Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 25-4-129 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-129. Gifts, grants, and donations — Reports.
(a) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
State Technology may accept on behalf of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology funds from any source, including but not limited
to:
(1) Special revenue;
(2) General revenue;
(3) Gifts;
(4) Grants;
(5) Cash;
(6) Bequests;
(7) Devices;
(8) Donations;
(9) Real property;
(10) Personal property; and
(11) Equipment.
(b) The division office shall file with the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, a quarterly
report summarizing all funds received under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 25-8-107(c), concerning the Office of
Child Support Enforcement, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Department of Human Services and the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology shall grant access to and provide
information determined by the Office of Child Support Enforcement to be
necessary to successfully accomplish its mission.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 25-18-702(a), concerning the standards and
policies pertaining to electronic records of state agencies, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology shall establish standards and polices governing the use,
management, retention, privacy, and security of electronic records of state
agencies.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 25-18-703 is amended to read as follows:
25-18-703. State agency standards and policies.
A state agency may use the standards and policies developed by the
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
under § 25-18-702, or it may develop its own standards and policies
consistent with the requirements established in § 25-18-702(b).

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 25-26-204(a)(1), concerning procurement
requirements for information technology access for the blind, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) The technology access clause specified in § 25-26-203 shall be
developed by the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
and shall require compliance with nonvisual access standards established by
the division office.

SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 25-27-103(a)(4), concerning the board
members of the Information Network of Arkansas, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) Two (2) members, or their designees, who are chief executive
officers of agencies of the executive branch other than the Department of
Finance and Administration and the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology, shall be appointed by the Governor;

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 25-27-103(a)(8), concerning the board
members of the Information Network of Arkansas, is amended to read as
follows:
(8) The Director of the Division of Information Systems Office of
State Technology, or the Director of the Division of Information Systems'
Office of State Technology's designee.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 25-27-104(a)(1), concerning the duties of
the Information Network of Arkansas, is amended to read as follows:
(1) To develop and implement an electronic gateway system to
provide electronic access to members of the public to public information and
to develop, implement, and promote the use of electronic commerce and digital
signature applications within the state in cooperation with the Division of
Information Systems Office of State Technology;

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 25-27-105(a)(1), concerning the network
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
manager of the Information Network of Arkansas, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Information Network of Arkansas shall procure a network
manager after developing, in consultation with the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology, criteria and specifications for such a
network manager and his or her duties.

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 25-27-105(c), concerning the network
manager of the Information Network of Arkansas, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The division office may provide to the Information Network of
Arkansas such staff and other assistance under contract.

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 25-32-117(b), concerning the creation and
retention of electronic records and conversion of written records by
governmental agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Each state agency shall comply with applicable standards and
policies adopted or established by the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services with advice and review from the Division of Information
Systems Office of State Technology to determine whether and the extent to
which it will retain and convert written records to electronic records.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 25-32-118(a)(2), concerning the acceptance
and distribution of electronic records by governmental agencies under the
Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) For state agencies, the determinations shall be consistent
with applicable standards and policies adopted or established by the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services with advice and review from
the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology.

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 25-34-104(a)(1), concerning agency policy
under the Arkansas Computer and Electronic Solid Waste Management Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Each agency shall prepare and implement an agency-wide policy
for the management and sale of agency surplus computer equipment and
electronics in accord with the Director of the Division of Information
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Systems Office of State Technology policies for review and replacement of
computer and electronic equipment.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 25-43-812(a)(3)(D), concerning the members
of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, is amended to read as
follows:
(D) A representative of the Division of Information Systems
Office of State Technology;

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1502(a)(5), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services,
is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Department of Information Systems, created under § 25-4-
104, now to be known as the “Division of Information Systems” "Office of
State Technology";

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 27-14-1708(b)(1), concerning the temporary
tag database within the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The vehicle temporary tag database shall be administered by the
Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration with the
assistance of the Division of Information Systems Office of State Technology
or other designated agent with whom the Revenue Division of the Department of
Finance and Administration may contract to supply technical database and data
processing expertise.

SECTION 69. DO NOT CODIFY. Corrections.
The Arkansas Code Revision Commission may change references to the
Division of Information Systems in the Arkansas Code to the Office of State
Technology:
(1) During the codification of legislation enacted during the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly; and
(2) In existing law that was not included in this act.

SECTION 70. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of
03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092

HB1647
Arkansas rely on state department and division names to conduct business with
the state; that to ensure the efficient operations of state government
divisions it is important to set a date certain for the official change of
the name of a division; and that this act is necessary because it will allow
the Division of Information Systems to prepare for the official name change
in a timely and efficient manner to coincide with the start of the fiscal
year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall
become effective on July 1, 2025.



























03/03/2025 2:12:47 PM LGL092